Hawaii, session 2026, GM1334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Declaration of findings with respect to the
general obligation bonds authorized by this Act. Pursuant to
article VII, section 13, of the state constitution, which
states: "Effective July 1, 1980, the legislature shall include
a declaration of findings in every general law authorizing the
issuance of general obligation bonds that the total amount of
principal and interest, estimated for such bonds and for all
bonds authorized and unissued and calculated for all bonds
issued and outstanding, will not cause the debt limit to be
exceeded at the time of issuance", the legislature finds and
declares as follows:
(1) Limitation on general obligation debt. The debt limit
of the State is set forth in article VII, section 13,
of the state constitution, which states in part:
"General obligation bonds may be issued by the State;
provided that such bonds at the time of issuance would
not cause the total amount of principal and interest
2026-3501 HB2452 GDI HMSO 1
llllM■■illllll■llln■

Page 2 H.B. NO.
payable in the current or any future fiscal year,
whichever is higher, on such bonds and on all
outstanding general obligation bonds to exceed: a sum
equal to twenty percent of the average of the general
fund revenues of the State in the three fiscal years
immediately preceding such issuance until June 30,
1982; and thereafter, a sum equal to eighteen and one-
half percent of the average of the general fund
revenues of the State in the three fiscal years
immediately preceding such issuance." Article VII,
section 13, of the state constitution also provides
that in determining the power of the State to issue
general obligation bonds, certain bonds are
excludable, including "[r]eimbursable general
obligation bonds issued for a public undertaking,
improvement or system but only to the extent that
reimbursements to the general fund are in fact made
from the net revenue, or net user tax receipts, or
combination of both, as determined for the immediately
preceding fiscal year" and bonds constituting
instruments of indebtedness under which the State
2026-3501 HB2452 CDl HMSO 2

Page 3
H.B. NO.
incurs a contingent liability as a guarantor, but only
to the extent the principal amount of those bonds does
not exceed seven per cent of the principal amount of
outstanding general obligation bonds not otherwise
excluded under said article VII, section 13, of the
state constitution.
(2) Actual and estimated debt limits. The limit on
principal and interest of general obligation bonds
issued by the State, actual for fiscal year 2025-2026
and estimated for each fiscal year from 2026-2027 to
2028-2029, is as follows:
Fiscal Net General
Ye^ Fund Revenues Debt Limit
2022-2023 $10,183,780,738
2023-2024 10,629,766,311
2024-2025 11,260,938,822
2025-2026 11,026,900,000 $ 1,977,926,629
2026-2027 10,609,520,000 2,029,918,983
2027-2028 10,821,218,000 2,028,670,461
2028-2029 (not applicable) 2,001,554,343

For fiscal years 2025-2026, 2026-2027, 2027-2028, and
2028-2029, respectively, the debt limit is derived by
multiplying the average of the net general fund
revenues for the three preceding fiscal years by
2026-3501 HB2452 CDl HMSO


Page 4 H.B. NO.
eighteen and one-half per cent. The net general fund
revenues for fiscal years 2022-2023, 2023-2024, and
2024-2025 are actual, as certified by the director of
finance in the Statement of the Debt Limit of the
State of Hawaii as of July 1, 2025, dated December 1,
2025. The net general fund revenues for fiscal years
2025-2026 to 2027-2028 are estimates, based on general
fund revenue estimates made as of March 10, 2026, by
the council on revenues, the body assigned by article
VII, section 7, of the state constitution to make such
estimates, and based on estimates made by the
department of budget and finance of those receipts
that cannot be included as general fund revenues for
the purpose of calculating the debt limit, all of
which estimates the legislature finds to be
reasonable.
(3) Principal and interest on outstanding bonds applicable
to the debt limit.
(A) According to the department of budget and
finance, the total amount of principal and
interest on outstanding general obligation bonds.
2026-3501 HB2452 GDI HMSO

Page 5 H.B. NO.
after the exclusions permitted by article VII,
section 13, of the state constitution, for
determining the power of the State to issue
general obligation bonds within the debt limit as
of April 1, 2026, is as follows for fiscal year
2026-2027 to fiscal year 2032-2033:
Fiscal Principal
Yea^ and Interest
2026-2027 $934,453,241
2027-2028 908,088,820
2028-2029 877,015,816
2029-2030 830,364,175
2030-2031 782,919,432
2031-2032 782,843,996
2032-2033 711,586,450

The department of budget and finance further
reports that the amount of principal and interest
on outstanding bonds applicable to the debt limit
generally continues to decline each year from
fiscal year 2033-2034 to fiscal year 2043-2044
when the final installment of $56,989,536 shall
be due and payable.
(B) The department of budget and finance further
reports that the outstanding principal amount of
2026-3501 HB2452 CDl HMSO 5
liiHiniiniiiiiiHH

Page 6 H.B. NO.
bonds constituting instruments of indebtedness
under which the State may incur a contingent
liability as a guarantor is $233,500,000, all or
part of which is excludable in determining the
power of the State to issue general obligation
bonds, pursuant to article VII, section 13, of
the state constitution.
(4) Amount of authorized and unissued general obligation
bonds and guaranties and proposed bonds and
guaranties.
(A) As calculated from the state comptroller's bond
fund report as of February 28, 2026, adjusted
for:
(i) Appropriations to be funded by general
obligation bonds or reimbursable general
obligation bonds as provided in Act 250,
Session Laws of Hawaii 2025 (the General
Appropriations Act of 2025), to be expended
in fiscal year 2026-2027, adjusted for
additional appropriations provided in House
2026-3501 HB2452 GDI HMSO
MiNiiiiiiniiiiiiiii

Page 7 H.B. NO.
"'1
C.D. 1
Bill No. 1800, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1 (the
Supplemental Appropriations Act of 2026);
(ii) Lapses as provided in House Bill No. 1800,
H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1 (the Supplemental
Appropriations Act of 2026);
(iii) Appropriations to be funded by general
obligation bonds or reimbursable general
obligation bonds as provided in Act 227,
Session Laws of Hawaii 2025 (the Judiciary
Appropriations Act of 2025) to be expended
in fiscal year 2026-2027, adjusted for
additional appropriations provided in House
Bill- No. 2095, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1 (the
Judiciary Supplemental Appropriations Act of
2026) ;
(iv) Lapses as provided in House Bill No. 2095,
H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1 (the Judiciary
Supplemental Appropriations Act of 2026);
the total amount of authorized but unissued
general obligation bonds is $5,961,333,782. The
total amount of general obligation bonds
2026-3501 HB2452 CDl HMSO

Page 8 H.B. NO.
authorized in this Act is $1,137,126,000. The
total amount of general obligation bonds
previously authorized and unissued, as adjusted,
and the general obligation bonds authorized in
S this Act is $7,098,459,782.
(B) As reported by the department of budget and
finance the outstanding principal amount of bonds
constituting instruments of indebtedness under
which the State may incur a contingent liability
as a guarantor is $233,500,000, all or part of
which is excludable in determining the power of
the State to issue general obligatioh bonds,
pursuant to article VII, section 13, of the state
constitution.
(5) Proposed general obligation bond issuance. As
reported therein for the fiscal years 2025-2026, 2026-
2027, 2027-2028, and 2028-2029, the State proposes to
issue $1,500,000,000 in general obligation bonds
during the second half of fiscal year 2025-2026,
$975,000,000 in general obligation bonds during the
first half of fiscal year 2026-2027, $950,000,000 in
2026-3501 HB2452 CDl HMSO 8

Page 9 H.B. NO.
general obligation bonds during the second half of
fiscal year 2026-2027 and semiannually during fiscal
year 2027-2028, and $900,000,000 in general obligation
bonds semiannually during fiscal year 2028-2029. The
State anticipates issuing a combination of twenty-year
serial bonds with principal repayments beginning the
first year and ten-year serial bonds with principal
repayments beginning the first year, payable in
substantially equal annual installments of principal
and interest payment with interest payments commencing
six months from the date of issuance and being paid
semi-annually thereafter. It is assumed that this
practice will continue to be applied to the bonds that
are proposed to be issued.
(6) Sufficiency of proposed general obligation bond
issuance to meet the requirements of authorized and
unissued bonds, as adjusted, and bonds authorized by
this Act. From the schedule reported in paragraph
(5), the total amount of general obligation bonds that
the State proposes to issue during the fiscal years
2025-2026 to 2027-2028 is $5,325,000,000. An
2026-3501 HB2452 CDl HMSO

Page 10 H.B. NO 2452
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
additional $1,800,000,000 is proposed to be issued in
fiscal year 2028-2029. The total amount of
$7,125,000,000 that is proposed to be issued through
fiscal year 2028-2029 is sufficient to meet the
requirements of the authorized and unissued bonds, as
adjusted, the total amount of which is $7,098,459,782
reported in paragraph (4), except for $1,773,459,782.
It is assumed that the appropriations to which an
additional $1,773,459,782 in bond issuance needs to be
applied will have been encumbered as of June 30, 2028.
II The $1,800,000,000 that is proposed to be issued in
fiscal year 2028-2029 will be sufficient to meet the
requirements of the June 30, 2028, encumbrances in the
amount of $1,773,459,782. The amount of assumed
encumbrances as of June 30, 2028, is reasonable and
conservative, based upon an inspection of June 30
encumbrances of the general obligation bond fund as
reported by the state comptroller. Thus, taking into
account the amount of authorized and unissued bonds,
as adjusted, and the bonds authorized by this Act
versus the amount of bonds proposed to be issued by
2026-3501 HB2452 CDl HMSO 1
MiiniiiiiiiNinuiiiiiig

Page 11 H.B. NO.
June 30, 2028, and the amount of June 30, 2028,
encumbrances versus the amount of bonds proposed to be
issued in fiscal year 2028-2029, the legislature finds
that in the aggregate, the amount of bonds proposed to
be issued is sufficient to meet the requirements of
all authorized and unissued bonds and the bonds
authorized by this Act.
(7) Bonds excludable in determining the power of the State
to issue bonds. As noted in paragraph (1), certain
bonds are excludable in determining the power of the
State to issue general obligation bonds.
(A) General obligation reimbursable bonds can be
excluded under certain conditions. It is not
possible to make a conclusive determination as to
the amount of reimbursable bonds which are
excludable from the amount of each proposed bond
issued because:
(i) It is not known exactly when projects for
which reimbursable bonds have been
authorized in prior acts and in this Act
will be implemented and will require the
2026-3501 HB2452 GDI HMSO 1

Page 12 H.B. NO 2452
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
application of proceeds from a particular
bond issue; and
(ii) Not all reimbursable general obligation
bonds may qualify for exclusion.
However, the legislature notes that with respect
to the principal and interest on outstanding
general obligation bonds, according to the
department of budget and finance, the average
proportion of principal and interest that is
excludable each year from the calculation against
the debt limit is 0.36 per cent for approximately
ten years from fiscal year 2025-2026 to fiscal
year 2034-2035. For the purpose of this
declaration, the assumption is made that 0.25 per
cent of each bond issue will be excludable from
the debt limit, an assumption that the
legislature finds to be reasonable and
conservative.
(B) Bonds constituting instruments of indebtedness
under which the State incurs a contingent
liability as a guarantor can be excluded, but
2026-3501 HB2452 GDI HMSO 12
iiiiiiiiiiiBiiiiniiiinin

Page 13
H.B. NO.
^1
only to the extent the principal amount of those
guaranties does not exceed seven per cent of the
principal amount of outstanding general
obligation bonds not otherwise excluded under
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; provided that
the State shall establish and maintain a reserve
in an amount in reasonable proportion to the
outstanding loans guaranteed by the State as
provided by law. According to the department of
budget and finance and the assumptions presented
herein, the total principal amount of outstanding
general obligation bonds and general obligation
bonds proposed to be issued, which are not
otherwise excluded under article VII, section 13,
of the state constitution for the fiscal years
2025-2026, 2026-2027, 2027-2028, and 2028-2029
are as follows:
Total amount of
General Obligation Bonds
not otherwise excluded by
Article VII, Section 13
Fiscal Year of the State Constitution
2026-3501 HB2452 CDl HMSO

Page 14 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
2025-2026 9,420,177,085
2026-2027 11,340,367,085
2027-2028 13,235,617,085
2028-2029 15,031,177,085

Based on the foregoing and based on the assumption
that the full amount of a guaranty is immediately due
and payable when such guaranty changes from a
contingent liability to an actual liability, the
aggregate principal amount of the portion of the
II outstanding guaranties and the guaranties proposed to
be incurred, which does not exceed seven per cent of
the average amount set forth in the last column of the
above table and for which reserve funds have been or
will have been established as heretofore provided, can
be excluded in determining the power of the State to
issue general obligation bonds. As it is not possible
to predict with a reasonable degree of certainty when
a guaranty will change from a contingent liability to
an actual liability, it is assumed in conformity with
fiscal conservatism and prudence, that all guaranties
not otherwise excluded pursuant to article VII,
section 13, of the state constitution will become due
2026-3501 HB2452 GDI HMSO 14
iiiiiiiiniiiiiimiiiiiiii

Page 15
H.B. NO.

and payable in the same fiscal year in which the
greatest amount of principal and interest on general
obligation bonds, after exclusions, occurs. Thus,
based on such assumptions and on the determination in
paragraph (8), all of the outstanding guaranties can
be excluded.
(8) Determination whether the debt limit will be exceeded
at the time of issuance. From the foregoing and on
the assumption that all of the bonds identified in
paragraph (5) will be issued at an interest rate not
to exceed 7.50 per cent in fiscal years 2026 through
2029, it can be determined from the following schedule
that the bonds that are proposed to be issued, which
include all authorized and unissued bonds previously
authorized, as adjusted, general obligation bonds, and
instruments of indebtedness under which the State
incurs a contingent liability as a guarantor
authorized in this Act, will not cause the debt limit
to be exceeded at the time of such issuance:
2026-3501 HB2452 GDI HMSO 15

Page 16
H.B. NO. 1^1
Greatest Amount
Time of Issuance and Year of
and Amount to be Debt Limit Highest Principal
Counted Against at Time of and Interest
Debt Limit Issuance on Bonds and Guaranties
2nd half FY 2025-2026
$1,496,250,000 1,977,926,629 1,113,478,890 (2026-2027)
1st half FY 2026-2027
$972,565,000 2,029,918,983 1,199,196,529 (2027-2028)
2nd half FY 2026-2027
$947,625,000 2,029,918,983 1,310,188,404 (2027-2028)
1st half FY 2027-2028
$947,625,000 2,028,670,461 1,387,554,572 (2028-2029)
2nd half FY 2027-2028
$947,625,000 2,028,670,461 1,498,546,447 (2028-2029)
1st half FY 2028-2029
$897,750,000 2,001,554,343 1,555,421,719 (2029-2030)
2nd half FY 2028-2029
$897,750,000 2,001,554,343 1,660,577,969 (2029-2030)



(9) Overall and concluding finding. From the facts,
estimates, and assumptions stated in this declaration
of findings, the conclusion is reached that the total
amount of principal and interest estimated for the
general obligation bonds authorized in this Act, and
for all bonds authorized and unissued, and calculated
for all bonds issued and outstanding, and all
guaranties, will not cause the debt limit to be
exceeded at the time of issuance.
2026-3501 HB2452 CDl HMSO 16

Page 17 H.B. NO. 2452
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. The legislature finds the bases for the
declaration of findings set forth in this Act are reasonable.
The assumptions set forth in this Act with respect to the
principal amount of general obligation bonds that will be
issued, the amount of principal and interest on reimbursable
general obligation bonds that are assumed to be excludable, and
the assumed maturity structure shall not be deemed to be
binding, it being the understanding of the legislature that such
matters must remain subject to substantial flexibility.
SECTION 3. Authorization for issuance of general
obligation bonds. General obligation bonds may be issued as
provided by law in an amount that may be necessary to finance
projects authorized in House Bill No. 1800, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D.
1. (the Supplemental Appropriations Act of 2026) and House Bill
No. 2095, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1 (the Judiciary Supplemental
Appropriations Act of 2026); passed by the legislature during
this regular session of 2026 and designated to be financed from
the general obligation bond fund and from the general obligation
bond fund with debt service cost to be paid from special funds;
provided that the sum total of general obligation bonds so
issued shall not exceed $1,137,126,000. The proceeds of the
2026-3501 HB2452 CDl HMSO

Page 18
H.B. NO.
general obligation bonds herein authorized are intended to be
applied to reimburse expenditures made after the effective date
of this Act for the purpose for which such bonds are
authorized. The foregoing statement of intent with respect to
reimbursement is made in conformity with Treasury Regulation
Section 1.150-2 of the United States Treasury Department.
Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, general obligation
bonds may be issued from time to time in accordance with section
39-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes, in such principal amount as may
be required to refund any general obligation bonds of the State
of Hawaii heretofore or hereafter issued pursuant to law.
SECTION 4. The provisions of this Act are declared to be
severable and if any portion thereof is held to be invalid for
any reason, the validity of the remainder of this Act shall not
be affected.
SECTION 5. In printing this Act, the revisor of statutes
shall substitute in section 1 and section 3 the corresponding
act numbers for bills identified therein.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3501 HB2452 CDl HMSO 18

H.B. NO.
APPROVED this 10th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2452, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B.No. 2452, S.D. 1,C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
141-26